Washington statutes.
RCW 43.280.011

Intent—Approval of committee recommendations.

The Washington state sexual assault services advisory committee issued a report to the department of commerce and the department of social and health services in June of 1995. The committee made several recommendations to improve the delivery of services to victims of sexual assault: (1) Consolidate the administration and funding of sexual assault and abuse services in one agency instead of splitting those functions between the department of social and health services and the department of commerce; (2) adopt a funding allocation plan to pool all funds for sexual assault services and to distribute them across the state to ensure the delivery of core and specialized services; (3) establish service, data collection, and management standards and outcome measurements for recipients of grants; and (4) create a data collection system to gather pertinent data concerning the delivery of sexual assault services to victims.

The legislature approves the recommendations of the advisory committee and consolidates the functions and funding for sexual assault services in the department of commerce to implement the advisory committee's recommendations.

[ 2012 c 29 s 2; 1996 c 123 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 123: See note following RCW 43.280.010.